Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-128. Investigations — Custody of child — Evaluation and commitment for mental illness or developmental disability.

When a child alleged to be delinquent or unruly is brought before the court, the court may notify a probation officer attached to the court or any such person, persons or agencies available to the court, or to the department of children's services, and it shall be their duty to:

Make an investigation of the case or conduct a preliminary inquiry if one has not already been conducted;

Be present in court to report when the case is heard;

Furnish such information and assistance as the court may require; and

Take charge of any child before or after the hearing as may be directed by the court.

A probation officer shall have, as to any child committed to such officer's care, the powers of a law enforcement officer. Subject to this part, the probation officer may bring such child before the court committing the child to the officer's care for further action as the court may deem fit and proper.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

At any time prior to a child being adjudicated unruly or dependent and neglected, or before the disposition of a child who has been adjudicated delinquent, unruly or dependent and neglected, the court may order that the department make an assessment of the child and report the findings and recommendations to the court. Such order of referral shall confer authority to the department or its designees to transport the child and to obtain any necessary evaluations of the child without further consent of the parent(s), legal custodian or guardian.

If, during the evaluation or assessment, the department determines that there is a need for treatment for either the mental or physical well being of the child, consent of the parent(s), guardian or current legal custodian shall be obtained. If such consent cannot be obtained, the department may apply to the court for authorization to provide consent on behalf of the child. If a child is suspected of being in need of or is eligible for special education services, then state and federal laws governing evaluation and placement must be followed.

A report to the court of the department's recommendations shall be made within fifteen (15) days, which may be extended up to thirty (30) days for good cause following the court's order of referral. The department shall include in the report a review of the child's previous records including, but not limited to, health and education records, a review of the child's family history and current family status, and a written recommendation concerning the child's status.

Any order of the court that places custody of a child with the department shall empower the department to select any specific residential or treatment placements or programs for the child according to the determination made by the department, its employees, agents or contractors.

During the pendency of any proceeding, the court may order the child examined at a suitable place by a physician regarding the child's medical condition, and may order medical or surgical treatment of a child who is suffering from a serious physical condition or illness that requires prompt treatment, even if the parent, guardian or other custodian has not been given notice of a hearing, is not available, or without good cause informs the court of such person's refusal to consent to treatment.

If, during the pendency of any proceeding under this chapter, there is reason to believe that the child may be suffering from mental illness, the court may order the child to be evaluated on an outpatient basis by a mental health agency or a licensed private practitioner designated by the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services to serve the court. If, during the pendency of any proceeding under this chapter, there is reason to believe that the child may be suffering from a developmental disability, the court may order the child to be evaluated on an outpatient basis by a mental health agency, developmental center or a licensed private practitioner designated by the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services to serve the court. The outpatient evaluation shall be completed no more than thirty (30) days after receipt of the order by the examining professional.

If, and only if, in either of the circumstances described in subdivision (e)(1)(A) the outpatient evaluator concludes that further evaluation and treatment are needed, the court may order the child hospitalized. If the court orders the child to be hospitalized in a department of mental health and substance abuse services facility, hospital or treatment resource, the child shall be placed into the custody of the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services at the expense of the county for not more than thirty (30) days at a facility, hospital or treatment resource with available, suitable accommodations. Prior to transporting a defendant for such evaluation and treatment in a department facility, the sheriff or other transportation agent shall determine that the receiving department facility has available, suitable accommodations.

If an evaluation is ordered under this subsection (e), the evaluator shall file a complete report with the court, which shall include:

Whether the child is mentally ill or developmentally disabled;

Identification of the care, training or treatment required to address conditions of mental illness or developmental disability that are found, and recommendations as to resources that may be able to provide such services;

Whether the child is subject to voluntary or involuntary admission or commitment for inpatient or residential services or for commitment to the custody of the department of mental health and substance abuse services for such conditions under title 33; and

Any other information requested by the court that is within the competence of the evaluator.

If it appears from the evaluation report and other information before the court that the child is in need of care, training or treatment for mental illness or developmental disability, the court may proceed in accordance with other provisions of this chapter or may order that proceedings be initiated before the court under § 37-1-175, § 33-5-402 or title 33, chapter 6, part 5.

When transportation of the child is necessary to obtain evaluations under this subsection (e), the court may order the child transported with the cost of the transportation borne by the county from which the child is sent.

If a community mental health center receives grants or contracts from the department of mental health and substance abuse services for services for mental illness or developmental disability and the commissioner has not designated another provider of outpatient evaluation for the court, the department shall contract with the center for evaluation services under this subsection (e), and the center shall provide such services ordered under this subsection (e) by courts in the center's catchment area.

If a child who is alleged to be delinquent or unruly is brought before the court, and if the court determines that there is reason to believe that the child is experiencing a behavioral health emergency, then the court may request the services of a crisis response provider designated by the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services to perform such services under title 33. For purposes of this subdivision (e)(6), “behavioral health emergency” means an acute onset of a behavioral health condition that manifests itself by an immediate substantial likelihood of serious harm as defined in § 33-6-501. If the crisis provider is unable to respond within two (2) hours of contact by the court, the crisis provider shall immediately notify the court and provide instructions for examination of the child under title 33, chapter 6, part 1.

After adjudication, but prior to the disposition of a child found to be dependent and neglected, delinquent, unruly or in need of services under § 37-1-175, the court may place the child in custody of the department of children's services for the purpose of evaluation and assessment if the department has a suitable placement available for such purpose. If the department determines that there is no suitable placement available, the court shall not order the department to take custody of the child for the purpose of evaluation and assessment. Such pre-disposition custody shall last for a maximum of thirty (30) days and the court shall have a hearing to determine the appropriate disposition before the expiration of the thirty (30) days.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 28; 1972, ch. 487, § 1; impl. am. 1975, ch. 219, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 35; 1980, ch. 639, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 29; 1981, ch. 247, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-228; Acts 1986, ch. 836, § 1; 1986, ch. 837, § 1; 1987, ch. 240, § 1; 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 35; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 74, 86-88, 183; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 6, 8C, 8G, 8H; 2009, ch. 549, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 47-51; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 255, § 2; 2016, ch. 598, § 3; 2018, ch. 1052, §§ 18, 19.

Code Commission Notes.

Subsection (c) was amended by Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 86; however, § 183 of that act purports to delete (c) in its entirety. Neither section refers to the other. Subsection (c) has been rewritten as set out in § 86, in accordance with the apparent legislative intent.

Compiler's Notes. For the establishment of the Tennessee Children's Plan, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted (b) which read: “(b)(1) When a petition is filed in the juvenile court alleging a child to be either an abandoned child or a dependent and neglected child, it is the function of the juvenile court, when necessary, to give the child emergency temporary care, and the court shall forthwith refer the case to the county director of public welfare to investigate the social conditions of the child and to report the findings to the court to aid the court in its disposition of the child. The director shall submit such director's findings pursuant to an order from the court. If the child who is the subject of the petition is in the custody of a licensed child-placing agency, or, if the petition is filed by a licensed child-placing agency, the referral may be made to the licensed child-placing agency having custody of the child or filing the petition in lieu of a referral to the director. The court may make informal adjustment of such cases as is provided by §37-1-110.“(2)(A) When the court finds, based upon a sworn petition or sworn testimony containing specific factual allegations, that there is probable cause to believe that the conditions specified in §37-1-114(a)(2) exist and the child is in need of the immediate protection of the court, the court may order that the child be removed from the custody of the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian or the person who physically possesses or controls the child, pending further investigation and hearing for a period not to exceed three (3) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays. In no case shall such order remain in effect for more than two (2) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, unless a petition is filed within the two-day period.“(B)(i) If the child is not returned to the parent, guardian or legal custodian within such three-day period, a hearing shall be conducted pursuant to §37-1-117(c).“(ii)(a) Subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i) may be waived by express and knowing waiver, by the parties to an action, including the parents, guardian or legal custodian, and the child or guardian ad litem for the child, if the child is of tender years.“(b) Any such waiver may be revoked at any time, at which time this section shall apply.“(C) In lieu of any disposition of the child authorized by subdivision (b)(2)(B)(ii)(b), the court may, in its discretion, authorize a representative of the department to remain in the child's home with the child until a parent, legal guardian or relative of the child enters the home and expresses a willingness and apparent ability to resume permanent charge of the child, or, in the case of a relative, to assume charge of the child until a parent or legal guardian enters the home and expresses such willingness and apparent ability.”

The 2018 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), added “or conduct a preliminary inquiry if one has not already been conducted” at the end, and, in (a)(2), substituted “Subject to this part” for “At any time” at the beginning of the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 598, § 5. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text of Rules 1, 32 and 38 and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 32 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 27.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

Attorney General Opinions. The General Assembly has neither explicitly nor implicitly supplied the Department of Children's Services (DCS) with authority to make decisions about extraordinary medical care, and the juvenile court may not unilaterally confer such authority upon DCS, OAG 04-127 (8/11/04).

The juvenile court has statutory authority to make decisions about extraordinary medical care of a child, particularly in the absence of a parent or other person or entity that independently holds such authority, OAG 04-127 (8/11/04).

37-1-129. Hearings — Judicial Diversion — Findings — Disposition of child.

If a child alleged to be delinquent or unruly enters a plea of guilty or no contest, or after an adjudicatory hearing, the court may defer further proceedings and place the child on judicial diversion and probation subject to reasonable conditions, which may include completion of substance abuse and mental health treatment services where appropriate, without entering a judgment of guilty and with the consent of the child. For delinquent offenses, such reasonable conditions must be consistent with a validated risk and needs assessment. Probation conditions must not include a period of detention or placing the child in custody of the department, but may include a transfer or grant pursuant to § 37-1-131(a)(1). A child must not be placed on judicial diversion if the delinquent act alleged is an offense described in § 37-1-153(b)(2), if the child has previously been adjudicated delinquent for such an offense, or if the matter is dismissed after a hearing on the merits.

A judicial diversion agreement shall remain in force for a maximum of six (6) months unless the child is discharged sooner by the court, subject to this subdivision (a)(2). Before expiration of the six-month period, and after notice and a hearing, the court may extend judicial diversion for an additional period not to exceed six (6) months, but only if the court finds and issues a written order that:

States that it is in the best interest of the child that a condition or conditions of judicial diversion remain in effect; and

Specifies the condition or conditions that shall remain in effect and why that continued effectiveness is in the best interest of the child.

If the supervising authority finds that the child has violated the terms or conditions of judicial diversion, the supervising authority may file a petition alleging a violation of the terms or conditions of judicial diversion with the court; provided, that the court, in its discretion, may direct the supervising authority that, in some or all circumstances, such a petition should be filed only if the supervising authority makes and documents attempts to address the noncompliant behavior and determines and documents the reasons for which court intervention is needed to address the noncompliance.

If a violation of any of the terms of judicial diversion probation is alleged, the child shall be given notice of the violation and an opportunity to be heard concerning the alleged violation. If, after a hearing, the court determines that a violation has occurred, the court may enter an adjudication of guilty and proceed to a dispositional hearing. If no violation is found, the court may continue the period of probation or may dismiss the petition.

If, during the period of probation, the child does not violate any of the conditions of the probation, then upon expiration of the period, the court shall discharge the child and dismiss the proceedings against the child.

If an adjudicatory hearing is held, the court shall make and file its findings as to whether the child is a dependent and neglected child, or, if the petition alleges that the child is delinquent or unruly, whether the acts ascribed to the child were committed by that child. If the court finds that the child is not a dependent or neglected child or that the allegations of delinquency or unruly conduct have not been established, it shall dismiss the petition and order the child discharged from any detention or other restriction theretofore ordered in the proceeding.

If the petition alleged the child was dependent and neglected as defined in § 37-1-102(b)(13)(G), or if the court so finds regardless of the grounds alleged in the petition, the court shall determine whether the parents or either of them or another person who had custody of the child committed severe child abuse. The court shall file written findings of fact that are the basis of its conclusions on that issue within thirty (30) days of the close of the hearing or, if an appeal or a petition for certiorari is filed, within five (5) days thereafter, excluding nonjudicial days. If the court finds the child is dependent and neglected, a dispositional hearing shall be held. In scheduling the hearing, the court shall give priority to proceedings in which a child has been removed from the child's home before an order of disposition has been made.

If the petition alleged the child was delinquent or unruly and the court finds that the child committed the alleged delinquent or unruly acts, the court shall further determine whether the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation and make and file its findings thereon. In the absence of evidence to the contrary, evidence of the commission of acts that constitute a felony or that reflect recidivistic delinquency is sufficient to sustain a finding that the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation. If the court finds the child is in need of treatment and rehabilitation, a dispositional hearing shall be held. If the court finds the child is not in need of treatment or rehabilitation, it shall dismiss the petition and discharge the child from any detention or other restriction. If the court continues its determination of whether the child is in need of treatment and rehabilitation or the dispositional hearing, it shall make an appropriate order for detention of the child or the child's release from detention, subject to supervision of the court during the period of the continuance. In scheduling the hearings, the court shall give priority to proceedings in which a child is in detention or has otherwise been removed from the child's home before an order of disposition has been made. The court shall minimize the use of detention between adjudication and disposition. In no event shall a dispositional hearing be postponed or continued because there is a waitlist for a suitable placement unless the child and, if applicable, the child's attorney, agree to the postponement or continuance in writing.

Any order of the court that places custody of a child with the department shall empower the department to select any specific residential or treatment placements or programs for the child according to the determination made by the department, its employees, agents or contractors.

The court may review the residential or treatment placement of a child placed in the department's custody, and within ninety (90) days of the placement, the court may, on its own motion, order a hearing to receive evidence and testimony with regard to the appropriateness of the child's residential or treatment placement. The court shall provide notice of the hearing to the department, to the child's biological parent or parents, and any other person who has been primarily responsible for the care of the child during the twelve (12) months prior to the child's placement in the department's custody. The court shall allow thirty (30) days from the time such notices are sent before the hearing date is set. The court shall issue a placement recommendation based on a preponderance of the evidence to the department within ten (10) days after the conclusion of the hearing. Upon receiving the court's recommendation, the department shall issue a determination as to the child's placement within fifteen (15) days. The department shall notify the court, the child's biological parent or parents, and any other person who has been primarily responsible for the care of the child during the twelve (12) months prior to the child's placement.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 29; 1977, ch. 482, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-229; Acts 1986, ch. 837, § 2; 1987, ch. 240, § 1; 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 42; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 89; 1997, ch. 479, § 1; 2004, ch. 859, § 1; 2010, ch. 820, § 1; 2012, ch. 1016, § 1; 2016, ch. 600, § 4; 2017, ch. 263, § 3; 2018, ch. 1052, §§ 20, 21; 2019, ch. 312, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote this section which read: “(a)(1) After hearing the evidence on the petition, the court shall make and file its findings as to whether the child is a dependent or neglected child, or, if the petition alleges that the child is delinquent or unruly, whether the acts ascribed to the child were committed by that child. If the court finds that the child is not a dependent or neglected child or that the allegations of delinquency or unruly conduct have not been established, it shall dismiss the petition and order the child discharged from any detention or other restriction theretofore ordered in the proceeding.“(2) If the petition alleged the child was dependent and neglected as defined in §37-1-102(b)(12)(G), or if the court so finds regardless of the grounds alleged in the petition, the court shall determine whether the parents or either of them or another person who had custody of the child committed severe child abuse. The court shall file written findings of fact that are the basis of its conclusions on that issue within thirty (30) days of the close of the hearing or, if an appeal or a petition for certiorari is filed, within five (5) days thereafter, excluding Sundays.“(b) If the court finds on proof beyond a reasonable doubt that the child committed the acts by reason of which the child is alleged to be delinquent, it shall proceed immediately or at a postponed hearing to hear evidence as to whether the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation and to make and file its findings thereon. If the court finds that the child is not in need of treatment or rehabilitation, it may dismiss the proceeding and discharge the child from any detention or other restriction theretofore ordered. In the absence of evidence to the contrary, evidence of the commission of acts that constitute a felony or that reflect recidivistic delinquency is sufficient to sustain a finding that the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.“(c) If the court finds from clear and convincing evidence that the child is dependent, neglected or unruly, the court shall proceed immediately or at a postponed hearing to make a proper disposition of the case.“(d) In hearings under subsections (b) and (c), all evidence helpful in determining the questions presented, including oral and written reports, may be received by the court and relied upon to the extent of its probative value even though not otherwise competent in the hearing on the petition. The parties or their counsel shall be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert written reports so received and to cross-examine individuals making the reports. Sources of confidential information need not be disclosed.“(e)(1) Any order of the court that places custody of a child with the department shall empower the department to select any specific residential or treatment placements or programs for the child according to the determination made by the department, its employees, agents or contractors.“(2) The court may review the residential or treatment placement of a child placed in the department's custody, and within ninety (90) days of the placement, the court may, on its own motion, order a hearing to receive evidence and testimony with regard to the appropriateness of the child's residential or treatment placement. The court shall provide notice of the hearing to the department, to the child's biological parent or parents, and any other person who has been primarily responsible for the care of the child during the twelve (12) months prior to the child's placement in the department's custody. The court shall allow thirty (30) days from the time such notices are sent before the hearing date is set. The court shall issue a placement recommendation based on a preponderance of the evidence to the department within ten (10) days after the conclusion of the hearing. Upon receiving the court's recommendation, the department shall issue a determination as to the child's placement within fifteen (15) days. The department shall notify the court, the child's biological parent or parents, and any other person who has been primarily responsible for the care of the child during the twelve (12) months prior to the child's placement.“(f) On its own motion or that of a party, the court may continue the hearings under this section for a reasonable period to receive reports and other evidence bearing on the disposition or the need for treatment or rehabilitation. In this event, the court shall make an appropriate order for detention of the child, or the child's release from detention, subject to supervision of the court during the period of the continuance. In scheduling investigations and hearings, the court shall give priority to proceedings in which a child is in detention or has otherwise been removed from the child's home before an order of disposition has been made.”

The 2017 amendment substituted “§37-1-102(b)(13)(G)” for “§37-1-102(b)(12)(G)” in the first sentence of (b)(2).

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added the last two sentences in (b)(3).

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(1), in the first sentence, substituted “subject to reasonable conditions which may include completion of substance abuse and mental health treatment services where appropriate,” for “upon such reasonable conditions as it may require” and inserted “, and, for delinquent offenses, such reasonable conditions shall be consistent with a validated risk and needs assessment”, and in the second sentence, inserted “, but may include a transfer or grant pursuant to §37-1-131(a)(1)”; added (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B); in the present introductory language of (a)(2), substituted “court, subject to this subdivision (a)(2). Before” for “court. Upon application of any party, to the proceedings, made before” preceding “expiration”, substituted “the court may extend judicial diversion” for “judicial diversion may be extended by the court” preceding “for an additional”, inserted “period not to exceed”, and added “, but only if the court finds and issues a written order that:”; added present (3)(A) and redesignated former (a)(3) as (a)(3)(B); and, in (a)(3)(B), substituted “judiciary” for “judicial” preceding “diversion”.

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a)(1), which read: “If a child alleged to be delinquent or unruly enters a plea of guilty or no contest, the court may defer further proceedings and place the child on probation subject to reasonable conditions, which may include completion of substance abuse and mental health treatment services where appropriate, without entering a judgment of guilty and with the consent of the child, and, for delinquent offenses, such reasonable conditions shall be consistent with a validated risk and needs assessment. Probation conditions shall not include a period of detention or placing the child in custody of the department, but may include a transfer or grant pursuant to §37-1-131(a)(1). A child shall not be placed on judicial diversion if the delinquent act alleged is an offense described in §37-1-153(b) or if the child has previously been adjudicated delinquent for such an offense.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 263, § 5. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; July 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 312, § 11. July 1, 2019.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 1 and in the text of Rules 28 and 32 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

This section is referred to in Rule 14 of the Rules Regulating Practice And Procedure In The Juvenile Court Of Memphis And Shelby County, Tennessee.

Law Reviews.

Guidelines for Juvenile Court Practice (Andrew J. Shookhoff), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 5 (1983).

37-1-130. Dependent or neglected child — Disposition.

If the child is found to be dependent or neglected, the court may make any of the following orders of disposition best suited to the protection and physical, mental and moral welfare of the child:

Subject to the restrictions of § 37-1-129(c), permit the child to remain with the child's parents, guardian or other custodian, subject to conditions and limitations as the court prescribes, including supervision as directed by the court for the protection of the child;

Subject to the restrictions of § 37-1-129(c), and subject to conditions and limitations as the court prescribes, transfer temporary legal custody to or grant permanent guardianship in accordance with part 8 of this chapter to any of the following:

Any individual who, after study by the probation officer or other person or agency designated by the court, is found by the court to be qualified to receive and care for the child;

The department of children's services:

Any child placed in the custody of the department of children's services shall become a resident of the county in which such child is placed by the department. The board of education of each local school system shall assign the student to a public school pursuant to § 49-6-3102;

In order to assure appropriate placement for students with disabilities, the procedures required by the state board of education must be followed;

If a student is determined to be a child with disabilities as defined by state and federal laws and regulations and, therefore, entitled to special education and related services, a multi-disciplinary team of the receiving school system must be convened prior to the placement of the child in the school system for the purpose of developing an appropriate educational program. The department shall notify the receiving school system as far in advance of the intended placement as possible. A representative from the department must be present at the multi-disciplinary team meeting;

Placements in educational programs not following the requirements set forth in this section shall be the financial responsibility of the department of education;

Any financial responsibility required under the provisions of this section for the education of children with disabilities whose parents are not residents of the county in which the children are placed shall be borne by the department of education and not by any local government. This provision shall not act to reduce federal funds for children with disabilities or special education going to any local education agency;

An agency or other private organization licensed or otherwise authorized by law to receive and provide care for the child; or

An individual in another state with or without supervision by an appropriate officer under § 37-1-142;

In those counties having a county department of children's services, commit the child to the custody of such county department; or

Without making any of the foregoing orders, transfer custody of the child to the juvenile court of another state if authorized by and in accordance with § 37-1-141 if the child is or is about to become a resident of that state.

Unless a child found to be dependent or neglected is found also to be delinquent, the child shall not be committed to or confined in an institution or other facility designed or operated for the benefit of delinquent children. Any disposition under this section shall be implemented as soon as possible after entry of the court's order. A disposition under subdivision (a)(2) or (3) shall, in no event, result in the child's detention in shelter care, as defined in § 37-1-116, or other temporary placement, without provision of necessary services consistent with the child's assessments or evaluations, in excess of thirty (30) days after entry of the court's order.

No child who has been found to be a victim of severe child abuse shall be returned to the custody or residence of any person who engaged in or knowingly failed to protect the child from the brutality or abuse unless the court finds on the basis of clear and convincing evidence that the child will be provided a safe home free from further such brutality and abuse. The court shall file written findings of fact that are the basis of its conclusions on that issue within thirty (30) days of the close of the hearing or, if an appeal or petition for certiorari is filed, within five (5) days thereafter, excluding Sundays. No such child shall be returned to such custody on the basis of the court's order until five (5) days after entry of the order without the consent of the department and the petitioner.

When the department determines that a child who has been committed to the department under this section is ready to return home, the department shall notify the court in writing of its intention to place the child at home on a trial home visit. If the court objects to the trial home visit, it must notify the department of its objection in writing or set a hearing within fifteen (15) days of the date of the notice, with such hearing to be held at the earliest possible date. If the hearing is not set nor a written objection received within fifteen (15) days of the date of the notice, the department may place the child on a trial home visit. The notice shall include the provision that the department's legal custody of the child shall terminate in ninety (90) days.

If during the ninety-day period the department determines that the trial home visit is not in the child's best interest and removes the child on an emergency basis or seeks to remove the child on a non-emergency basis, the department shall file a motion for review by the court of the trial home visit and shall provide notice to the parent or parents, guardian or other custodian. The court shall hold a hearing on such motion within three (3) days of an emergency removal and shall set a hearing within fifteen (15) days to be held at the earliest possible date if the motion seeks the court's permission to make a non-emergency removal.

During the ninety-day trial home visit, the court may periodically review the child's status and may make any orders that the best interest of the child may require.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 30; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; 1977, ch. 482, § 4; Acts 1978, ch. 886, § 1; 1979, ch. 143, § 9; T.C.A., § 37-230; Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 2; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 90, 91; 1999, ch. 508, § 7; 2007, ch. 372, § 3; 2011, ch. 314, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 397, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the establishment of the Tennessee Children's Plan, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

Cross-References. Education of children with disabilities, title 49, ch. 10.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rules 1 and 32 and in the text of Rule 32 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.1.

Law Reviews.

Indigent Parent's Right to Counsel in Child Neglect Cases, 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 649 (1979).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of juvenile court to order or administer corporal punishment, OAG 95-040 (4/18/95).

Order removing child from home county and enjoining return, OAG 99-007 (1/25/99).

When the juvenile court has adjudicated a child dependent or neglected and has placed the child in the department of children's services' custody but has not terminated parental rights, the department of children's services has the right and duty to be present at a multi-disciplinary (IEP) team meeting, OAG 02-022 (2/26/02).